zh-TW: 雨水桶設計: 折疊式; 裝飾; 可擴展; 堅固型; 細長型; 可堆疊; 其他
nl: Regentonontwerp: Inklapbaar; Decoratief; Uitbreidbaar; Onbuigzaam; Slimline; Stapelbaar; Overig
fr: Conception du récupérateur d’eau de pluie: Pliable; Décoratif; Extensible; Rigide; Mince; Empilable; Autre
sv: Design av regntunna: Hopfällbar; Dekorativ; Expanderbar; Styv; Slimmad; Stapelbar; Övrigt
vi: Thiết kế thùng chứa nước mưa: Có thể thu gọn; Trang trí; Có thể mở rộng; Rắn; Siêu mỏng; Có thể xếp chồng; Khác
zh-CN: 雨水收集工具的设计: 可折叠; 装饰性; 可伸缩; 刚性; 超薄; 可叠放; 其他
ja: 雨水タンクのデザイン: 折りたたみ可能; 装飾; 拡張可能; 硬質; スリムライン; 積み重ね可能; その他
nb: Regntønnedesign: Sammenleggbar; Dekorativ; Utvidbar; Rigid; Slankeprofil; Kan stables; Annet
tr: Yağmur suyu toplama varili tasarımı: İç içe geçebilir; Dekoratif; Genişletilebilir; Sert; İnce profil; İstiflenebilir; Diğer
th: การออกแบบถังเก็บน้ำฝน: พับเก็บได้; ตกแต่ง; ขยายได้; ขอบแข็ง; แบบบาง; วางซ้อนกันได้; อื่นๆ
en: Rain barrel design: Collapsible; Decorative; Expandable; Rigid; Slimline; Stackable; Other
bg-BG: Дизайн на варел за дъждовна вода: Сгъваемо; Декоративно; Разгъващ се; Издържливо; Тънко; Може да се слага едно върху друго; Друго
da: Regnvandstøndedesign: Sammenklappelig; Dekorativ; Kan udvides; Stiv; Slimline; Stabelbar; Andet
hr-HR: Dizajn bačve za kišnicu: Produljivo; Ukrasni; Proširivi; Kruti; Tanki; Može se slagati; Ostalo
ko: 빗물통 디자인: 접이식; 데코형; 확장 가능; 강체; 슬림라인; 적층형; 기타
fi: Sadetynnyrin muotoilu: Kokoontaitettava; Koristeellinen; Laajennettava; Jäykkä; Ohut; Pinottava; Muu
pt-PT: Design do barril de recolha de água da chuva: Colapsável; Decorativo; Expansível; Rígido; Fino; Empilhável; Outro
ru: Конструкция бочки для дождевой воды: Складная; Декоративная; Расширяемая; Жесткая; Узкая; Компактное хранение стопкой; Другая
de: Regentonnendesign: Zusammenklappbar; Dekorativ; Erweiterbar; Starr; Schlank; Stapelbar; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Zasnova zbiralnika za deževnico: Zložljiva; Dekorativna; Razširljiv; Togo; Tanki; Zložljiva ena na drugo; Druga
ro-RO: Designul butoiului de apă pluvială: Pliabil; Decorativ; Extensibil; Rigid; Subțire; Superpozabil; Altele
es: Diseño de barril para recoger agua de lluvia: Plegable; Decorativo; Ampliable; Rígido; Delgado; Apilable; Otros
it: Design di barili per la raccolta pioggia: Richiudibile; Decorativo; Espandibile; Rigido; Sottile; Impilabile; Altro
el: Σχεδιασμός βαρελιού συλλογής βρόχινου νερού: Πτυσσόμενο; Διακοσμητικό; Επεκτάσιμο; Άκαμπτο; Λεπτό; Στοιβαζόμενο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Konštrukcia dažďovej nádrže: Skladací; Dekoratívny; Výsuvný; Pevný; Štíhly; Stohovateľný; Iné
cs: Konstrukce sudu na dešťovou vodu: Skládací; Dekorativní; Nastavitelné; Pevné; Štíhlé; Stohovatelné; Jiné
hu: Esőhordó kialakítása: Összecsukható; Díszes; Bővíthető; Merev; Vékony; Egymásra rakható; Egyéb
pt-BR: Design do tanque de chuva: Dobrável; Decorativo; Expansível; Rígida; Linha fina; Empilhável; Outro
lt-LT: Lietaus vandens statinės tipas: Sutraukiama; Dekoratyvinė; Išplečiama; Standi; Plona; Komplektuojama; Kita
pl: Konstrukcja beczki na deszczówkę: Składane; Dekoracyjne; Do rozbudowy; Sztywne; Smukłe; Sztaplowane; Inne